Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-1408
Commission; members; expenses.

Members of the commission shall receive no compensation for the performance of their duties but shall be reimbursed for their actual and necessary expenses as provided in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177.

Laws 1991, LB 663, § 11.